Missouri, session 2026, HB2343.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 211, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 211.575, to read as follows:
211.575. 1. The "Task Force on Juvenile Justice and Education" is hereby
created to study and make recommendations on the processes, procedures, and
protocols regarding education for adjudicated youth in Missouri. The task force shall
consist of the following members:
(1) One member of the senate appointed by the president pro tempore of the
senate;
(2) One member of the senate appointed by the minority floor leader of the
senate;
(3) One member of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives;
(4) One member of the house of representatives appointed by the minority floor
leader of the house of representatives;
(5) The secretary of state or his or her designee;
(6) The attorney general or his or her designee; and
(7) A current or former judge from the juvenile or family court appointed by the
St. Louis juvenile court system.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2343 2
2. Members of the task force shall be individuals who are actively involved in or
have a well-documented interest in the fields of education, special education, or
adjudicated youth. The appointment of members shall reflect the geographic diversity
of the state.
3. The task force shall elect a presiding officer by a majority vote of the members
of the task force. The task force shall meet at the call of the presiding officer.
4. The task force shall study nationally recognized best practices and make
recommendations regarding the development and implementation of effective state-
wide processes and procedures for the appropriate education of adjudicated youth. In
making the recommendations, the task force shall:
(1) Gather information concerning current processes, procedures, protocols, and
adherence from throughout the state;
(2) Receive reports and testimony from individuals, state and local agencies,
community-based organizations, and other public and private organizations; and
(3) Create goals for state policy that would ensure adjudicated youth receive
free, appropriate, and consistent education.
5. The recommendations may include proposals for specific statutory changes
and additions or methods to foster cooperation among state agencies and between the
state and local government.
6. The task force shall consult with employees of the department of social
services, the department of public safety, the department of elementary and secondary
education, the department of corrections, and any other state agency, board,
commission, office, or department as necessary to accomplish the task force's
responsibilities under this section.
7. The task force shall meet within two months of August 28, 2026.
8. The members of the task force shall serve without compensation and shall not
be reimbursed for their expenses.
9. The secretary of state's and attorney general's offices shall provide
administrative support to the task force.
10. On or before December 31, 2026, the task force shall submit a report on the
task force's findings to the governor and general assembly.
✔